Louisiana, session 2026, SB336.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 46:438.9 and 438.10 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§438.9. Civil investigative demand
A.(1) When the attorney general has information, evidence, or reason to
believe that a person or an entity may be in possession, custody, or control of
any documentary material, information, or physical evidence relevant to an
investigation of a violation of Subpart B of Part VI-A of this Chapter, he may
issue to the person or entity a civil investigative demand to require answering
under oath and in writing any interrogatories or the production for inspection,
copying, or reproduction of documentary material, information, or physical
evidence before the commencement of a civil proceeding. A civil investigative
demand issued pursuant to this Section shall state a general description of the
Page 1 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 336 ENROLLED
subject matter being investigated. Each investigative demand shall set a return
date of not earlier than twenty days after service of the demand upon the
person, legal representative, or agent for service of process.
(2) A civil investigative demand for answers to written interrogatories
shall set forth with specificity the written interrogatories to be answered. A civil
investigative demand for the production of documentary material shall describe
each class of documentary material to be produced with definiteness and
certainty to permit the material to be fairly identified.
(3) A civil investigative demand may not contain an unreasonable
requirement if contained in a subpoena or subpoena duces tecum issued by a
court in a grand jury investigation or require the production of written answers
to interrogatories, or the production of documentary material that is privileged
from disclosure.
(4) The production of documentary material in response to a civil
investigative demand served under this Section shall be made under a sworn
certificate stating that all of the documentary material required by the demand
and in the possession, custody, or control of the person to whom the demand is
directed has been produced and made available to the attorney general. If the
demand is made on a natural person, the person to whom the demand is
directed shall make the certification. If the demand is on a person other than a
natural person, a person having knowledge of the facts and circumstances
relating to the production of material and authorized to act on behalf of the
person shall make the certification.
B. A civil investigative demand issued pursuant to this Section may be
served by the sheriff or a post-certified investigator employed by the attorney
general when the demand is issued to a resident or domestic business entity
found in this state. A civil investigative demand issued to a nonresident or a
foreign business entity shall be served as provided for in the Code of Civil
Procedure.
C. Upon failure of the person or business entity to comply with the civil
Page 2 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 336 ENROLLED
investigative demand, the attorney general may file a motion with a district
court of proper jurisdiction to compel compliance with the civil investigative
demand. Failure to comply with a court order shall be punishable by contempt
of court.
D. Except as otherwise provided in this Section, no documentary
material, answers to interrogatories, or copies of material or interrogatories,
produced pursuant to this Section or information derived therefrom, or
transcripts and information derived from investigative depositions conducted
pursuant to R.S. 46:438.10 shall be subject to disclosure, discovery, subpoena,
or other means of legal compulsion for release by any person or entity except
as determined by the attorney general and subject to the imposition of any
conditions for effective enforcement of the laws of this state.
E. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to prohibit or limit the
attorney general from sharing any documentary material, answers to
interrogatories, or copies, or information derived therefrom, or transcripts and
information derived from investigative depositions conducted pursuant to R.S.
46:438.10 with any other state government, the United States government, or
any state or federal agency, or any person or entity that assists in the
investigation or prosecution involved in the subject matter of the civil
investigative demand.
F. The attorney general may use documentary material derived from
information obtained pursuant to this Section, or copies of the material, in the
manner the attorney general determines necessary for the enforcement of the
laws of this state, including instituting a civil proceeding with the court.
G. The attorney general, upon the written request of a person or entity
required to produce documentary material pursuant to this Section, shall
destroy or return to the person or entity any material which has not become a
part of the record by introduction into evidence in any court, grand jury, or
agency proceeding if the case or proceeding has been completed, or proceedings
have not been instituted within a reasonable time after analysis of all
Page 3 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 336 ENROLLED
documentary material and other information produced in the course of the
investigation.
H. Documentary material, answers to written interrogatories, or oral
testimony provided pursuant to a civil investigative demand or investigative
deposition are exempt from disclosure under the Public Records Law, R.S. 44:1
et seq.
I. "Documentary material" as used in this Section includes but is not
limited to all electronically stored information including writings, drawings,
graphs, charts, photographs, sound recordings, images, and other data or data
compilations that are subject to a request for production under Federal Rule of
Civil Procedure 34.
J. A person who has received a civil investigative demand pursuant to
Subsection A of this Section may seek to modify or set aside the demand by
filing a petition through ordinary proceedings with the court in the judicial
district within which the person resides, is found, or transacts business. If no
such jurisdiction exists, the person may file the petition in the Nineteenth
Judicial District Court.
(1) A petition filed pursuant to this Subsection shall be filed within
twenty days after the date of service of the civil investigative demand authorized
in accordance with this Section, or at any time before the return date specified
in the demand, whichever date is earlier.
(2) The petition shall specify each ground upon which the petitioner is
seeking relief in accordance with Subsection A of this Section, and may be based
upon any failure of the demand to comply with the provisions of this Section or
upon any constitutional or other legal right or privilege of the person.
(3) During the pendency of proceedings, the court in its discretion may
stay the running of the time allowed for compliance with the demand, in whole
or in part, except that the person filing the petition shall comply with any
portions of the demand not sought to be modified or set aside.
§438.10. Investigative deposition
Page 4 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 336 ENROLLED
A.(1) When the attorney general has information, evidence, or reason to
believe that a person or entity has information related to an investigation of a
violation of Subpart B of Part VI-A of this Chapter, he may issue an
investigative subpoena for deposition testimony to any person or entity that may
have information or knowledge relevant to the matter under investigation, or
for the purpose of revealing, identifying, or explaining documentary material
or other physical evidence sought.
(2) The investigative subpoena shall contain a general description of the
matter under investigation, and a notice informing the deponent of his right to
counsel at the deposition with an opportunity for cross-examination. The
deposition shall be conducted at the deponent's principal place of business,
place of residence, domicile, or, if agreeable to the deponent, some other place
convenient to the attorney general or the deponent and the deponent's attorney
or designated lawful representative.
(3) The deposition shall be held on a date not earlier than seven days
after the date on which demand was received, unless the attorney general
determines that exceptional circumstances exist that warrant the
commencement of the testimony within a shorter period of time.
B. An investigative subpoena issued pursuant to this Section may be
served by the sheriff or a post-certified investigator employed by the attorney
general when the demand is issued to a resident or domestic business entity
found in this state. An investigative subpoena issued to a nonresident or a
foreign business entity may be served pursuant to the Code of Civil Procedure.
C. When an investigative subpoena is issued to a business entity, the
entity shall designate one or more officers, directors, or managing agents, and
may set forth, for each person designated, the matters on which he is to testify.
The person designated shall testify to the matters known or reasonably available
to the organization.
D. Upon failure of the person or business entity to comply with the
investigative subpoena, the attorney general may file a motion with a district
Page 5 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 336 ENROLLED
court of proper jurisdiction to compel compliance with the investigative
subpoena. Failure to comply with a court order is punishable by contempt of
court.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 6 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.